Massachusetts, session 194th, H3694.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4B of Chapter 89 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following sentence:-
Vehicles operating on a spare tire shall be prohibited from driving in the lane nearest to the left
side of the way, regardless if such a lane is available for travel.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1